dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX WB Y      93
SFX WB sati   šem        sati
SFX WB sati   šeš        sati
SFX WB sati   še         sati
SFX WB sati   šemo       sati
SFX WB sati   šete       sati
SFX WB sati   šu         sati
SFX WB dati   đem        dati
SFX WB dati   đeš        dati
SFX WB dati   đe         dati
SFX WB dati   đemo       dati
SFX WB dati   đete       dati
SFX WB dati   đu         dati
SFX WB hati   šem        hati
SFX WB hati   šeš        hati
SFX WB hati   še         hati
SFX WB hati   šemo       hati
SFX WB hati   šete       hati
SFX WB hati   šu         hati
SFX WB cati   čem        cati
SFX WB cati   češ        cati
SFX WB cati   če         cati
SFX WB cati   čemo       cati
SFX WB cati   čete       cati
SFX WB cati   ču         cati
SFX WB kati   čem        kati
SFX WB kati   češ        kati
SFX WB kati   če         kati
SFX WB kati   čemo       kati
SFX WB kati   čete       kati
SFX WB kati   ču         kati
SFX WB zati   žem        zati
SFX WB zati   žeš        zati
SFX WB zati   že         zati
SFX WB zati   žemo       zati
SFX WB zati   žete       zati
SFX WB zati   žu         zati
SFX WB gati   žem        gati
SFX WB gati   žeš        gati
SFX WB gati   že         gati
SFX WB gati   žemo       gati
SFX WB gati   žete       gati
SFX WB gati   žu         gati
SFX WB tati   ćem        tati
SFX WB tati   ćeš        tati
SFX WB tati   će         tati
SFX WB tati   ćemo       tati
SFX WB tati   ćete       tati
SFX WB tati   ću         tati
SFX WB jati   jem        jati
SFX WB jati   ješ        jati
SFX WB jati   je         jati
SFX WB jati   jemo       jati
SFX WB jati   jete       jati
SFX WB jati   ju         jati
SFX WB ati    ah         ati
SFX WB ati    a          ati
SFX WB ati    asmo       ati
SFX WB ati    aste       ati
SFX WB ati    aše        ati
SFX WB sati   ši         sati
SFX WB sati   šimo       sati
SFX WB sati   šite       sati
SFX WB dati   đi         dati
SFX WB dati   đimo       dati
SFX WB dati   đite       dati
SFX WB hati   ši         hati
SFX WB hati   šimo       hati
SFX WB hati   šite       hati
SFX WB cati   či         cati
SFX WB cati   čimo       cati
SFX WB cati   čite       cati
SFX WB kati   či         kati
SFX WB kati   čimo       kati
SFX WB kati   čite       kati
SFX WB zati   ži         zati
SFX WB zati   žimo       zati
SFX WB zati   žite       zati
SFX WB gati   ži         gati
SFX WB gati   žimo       gati
SFX WB gati   žite       gati
SFX WB tati   ći         tati
SFX WB tati   ćimo       tati
SFX WB tati   ćite       tati
SFX WB jati   j          jati
SFX WB jati   jmo        jati
SFX WB jati   jte        jati
SFX WB ati    ao         ati
SFX WB ati    ala        ati
SFX WB ati    alo        ati
SFX WB ati    ali        ati
SFX WB ati    ale        ati
SFX WB ati    avši       ati
SFX WB ati    at         ati

SFX WA Y      80
SFX WA rati   erem       rati
SFX WA rati   ereš       rati
SFX WA rati   ere        rati
SFX WA rati   eremo      rati
SFX WA rati   erete      rati
SFX WA rati   eru        rati
SFX WA slati  šaljem     slati
SFX WA slati  šalješ     slati
SFX WA slati  šalje      slati
SFX WA slati  šaljemo    slati
SFX WA slati  šaljete    slati
SFX WA slati  šalju      slati
SFX WA klati  koljem     klati
SFX WA klati  kolješ     klati
SFX WA klati  kolje      klati
SFX WA klati  koljemo    klati
SFX WA klati  koljete    klati
SFX WA klati  kolju      klati
SFX WA vati   ovem       vati
SFX WA vati   oveš       vati
SFX WA vati   ove        vati
SFX WA vati   ovemo      vati
SFX WA vati   ovete      vati
SFX WA vati   ovu        vati
SFX WA ajati  ojim       ajati
SFX WA ajati  ojiš       ajati
SFX WA ajati  oji        ajati
SFX WA ajati  ojimo      ajati
SFX WA ajati  ojite      ajati
SFX WA ajati  oje        ajati
SFX WA skati  šćem       skati
SFX WA skati  šćeš       skati
SFX WA skati  šće        skati
SFX WA skati  šćemo      skati
SFX WA skati  šćete      skati
SFX WA skati  šću        skati
SFX WA tati   tanem      tati
SFX WA tati   taneš      tati
SFX WA tati   tane       tati
SFX WA tati   tanemo     tati
SFX WA tati   tanete     tati
SFX WA tati   tanu       tati
SFX WA ati    ah         ati
SFX WA ati    a          ati
SFX WA ati    asmo       ati
SFX WA ati    aste       ati
SFX WA ati    aše        ati
SFX WA ati    adoh       stati
SFX WA ati    ade        stati
SFX WA ati    adosmo     stati
SFX WA ati    adoste     stati
SFX WA ati    adoše      stati
SFX WA rati   eri        rati
SFX WA rati   erimo      rati
SFX WA rati   erite      rati
SFX WA slati  šalji      slati
SFX WA slati  šaljimo    slati
SFX WA slati  šaljite    slati
SFX WA klati  kolji      klati
SFX WA klati  koljimo    klati
SFX WA klati  koljite    klati
SFX WA vati   ovi        vati
SFX WA vati   ovimo      vati
SFX WA vati   ovite      vati
SFX WA ajati  oj         ajati
SFX WA ajati  ojmo       ajati
SFX WA ajati  ojte       ajati
SFX WA skati  šći        skati
SFX WA skati  šćimo      skati
SFX WA skati  šćite      skati
SFX WA tati   tani       tati
SFX WA tati   tanimo     tati
SFX WA tati   tanite     tati
SFX WA ati    ao         ati
SFX WA ati    ala        ati
SFX WA ati    alo        ati
SFX WA ati    ali        ati
SFX WA ati    ale        ati
SFX WA ati    avši       ati
SFX WA ati    at         ati

SFX VZ Y      21
SFX VZ ati    em         ati
SFX VZ ati    eš         ati
SFX VZ ati    e          ati
SFX VZ ati    emo        ati
SFX VZ ati    ete        ati
SFX VZ ati    u          ati
SFX VZ ati    ah         ati
SFX VZ ati    a          ati
SFX VZ ati    asmo       ati
SFX VZ ati    aste       ati
SFX VZ ati    aše        ati
SFX VZ ati    i          ati
SFX VZ ati    imo        ati
SFX VZ ati    ite        ati
SFX VZ ati    ao         ati
SFX VZ ati    ala        ati
SFX VZ ati    alo        ati
SFX VZ ati    ali        ati
SFX VZ ati    ale        ati
SFX VZ ati    avši       ati
SFX VZ ati    at         ati

SFX VY Y      21
SFX VY ati    im         ati
SFX VY ati    iš         ati
SFX VY ati    i          ati
SFX VY ati    imo        ati
SFX VY ati    ite        ati
SFX VY ati    e          ati
SFX VY ati    ah         ati
SFX VY ati    a          ati
SFX VY ati    asmo       ati
SFX VY ati    aste       ati
SFX VY ati    aše        ati
SFX VY ati    i          ati
SFX VY ati    imo        ati
SFX VY ati    ite        ati
SFX VY ati    ao         ati
SFX VY ati    ala        ati
SFX VY ati    alo        ati
SFX VY ati    ali        ati
SFX VY ati    ale        ati
SFX VY ati    avši       ati
SFX VY ati    at         ati

SFX VX Y      21
SFX VX ati    anem       stati
SFX VX ati    aneš       stati
SFX VX ati    ane        stati
SFX VX ati    anemo      stati
SFX VX ati    anete      stati
SFX VX ati    anu        stati
SFX VX ati    adoh       stati
SFX VX ati    ade        stati
SFX VX ati    adosmo     stati
SFX VX ati    adoste     stati
SFX VX ati    adoše      stati
SFX VX ati    ani        stati
SFX VX ati    animo      stati
SFX VX ati    anite      stati
SFX VX ati    ao         stati
SFX VX ati    ala        stati
SFX VX ati    alo        stati
SFX VX ati    ali        stati
SFX VX ati    ale        stati
SFX VX ati    avši       stati
SFX VX ati    at         stati

SFX VW Y      20
SFX VW ći     đem        ći
SFX VW ći     đeš        ći
SFX VW ći     đe         ći
SFX VW ći     đemo       ći
SFX VW ći     đete       ći
SFX VW ći     đu         ći
SFX VW ći     đoh        ći
SFX VW ći     đe         ći
SFX VW ći     đosmo      ći
SFX VW ći     đoste      ći
SFX VW ći     đoše       ći
SFX VW ći     đi         ći
SFX VW ći     đimo       ći
SFX VW ći     đite       ći
SFX VW ći     šao        ći
SFX VW ći     šla        ći
SFX VW ći     šlo        ći
SFX VW ći     šli        ći
SFX VW ći     šle        ći
SFX VW ći     šavši      ći

AF XOWBURUC	# 83
AF WZWBUC	# 110
AF WZWA	# 111
AF WB	# 168
AF WBUR	# 169
AF WBURUD	# 170
AF WBURUC	# 171
AF WBUD	# 174
AF WBUC	# 175
AF WA	# 176
AF WAURUC	# 179
AF WAUD	# 180
AF WAUC	# 181
AF VZ	# 182
AF VZUD	# 184
AF VZUC	# 185
AF VY	# 186
AF VYURUC	# 187
AF VYUD	# 188
AF VYUC	# 189
AF VX	# 190
AF VXUR	# 191
AF VW	# 192
AF VWVT	# 193
AF VWVS	# 194
